Georgia, session 2025_26, HB670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
21 PART I
22 SECTION 1-1.
23 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Civil Rights Act of 2025."
24 SECTION 1-2.
25 (a) The General Assembly finds that:
26 (1) Georgia is one of only three states without comprehensive state civil rights laws
27 protecting individuals from discrimination in employment, housing, and public
28 accommodations;
29 (2) The General Assembly has considered legislation in recent years adding specific
30 protections against discrimination for people based on religious beliefs, as well as sexual
31 orientation, in separate contexts;
32 (3) The Georgia Constitution guarantees equal protection under the law for all citizens;
33 (4) The Georgia Constitution guarantees the natural and inalienable right to worship God,
34 according to the dictates of a person's own conscience; and no human authority should, in
35 any case, control or interfere with such right of conscience;
36 (5) The Georgia Constitution holds that no one should be molested in person or property
37 on account of religious opinions; but the right of freedom of religion shall not be construed
38 as to excuse acts of licentiousness or justify practices inconsistent with the peace and safety
39 of this state; and
H. B. 670
- 2 -

25 LC 48 1550
40 (6) It is the duty of the General Assembly to enact such laws as will protect all citizens in
41 the full enjoyment of the rights, privileges, and immunities due to such citizenship.
42 (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly:
43 (1) To expand and clarify civil rights laws in this state by addressing discrimination in
44 employment, housing, and public accommodations; and
45 (2) That this Act shall be liberally construed to safeguard against the discrimination
46 prohibited herein.
47 PART II
48 SECTION 2-1.
49 Title 8 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to buildings and housing, is
50 amended by revising Code Section 8-3-200, relating to state policy and purposes and
51 construction of article, as follows:
52 "8-3-200.
53 (a) It is the policy of the State of Georgia to provide, within constitutional limitations, for
54 fair housing throughout this state.
55 (b) The general purposes of this article are:
56 (1) To provide for execution in the this state of policies embodied in Title VIII of the
57 Civil Rights Act of 1968, as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988;
58 (2) To safeguard all individuals from discrimination in any aspect relating to the sale,
59 rental, or financing of dwellings or in the provision of brokerage services or facilities in
60 connection with the sale or rental of a dwelling because of that individual's such
61 individuals' race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability or handicap,
62 familial status, or national origin;
63 (3) To promote the elimination of discrimination in any aspect relating to the sale, rental,
64 or financing of dwellings or in the provision of brokerage services or facilities in
H. B. 670
- 3 -

25 LC 48 1550
65 connection with the sale or rental of a dwelling because of a person's race, color, religion,
66 sex, sexual orientation, age, disability or handicap, familial status, or national origin; and
67 (4) To promote the protection of each individual's interest in personal dignity and
68 freedom from humiliation and the individual's freedom to take up residence wherever
69 such individual chooses; to secure the state against domestic strife and unrest which
70 would menace its democratic institutions; to preserve the public safety, health, and
71 general welfare; and to further the interests, rights, and privileges of individuals within
72 this state.
73 (c) This article shall be broadly construed to further the general purposes stated in this
74 Code section and the special purposes of the particular provision involved."
75 SECTION 2-2.
76 Said title is further amended by revising paragraphs (1) through (5) of subsection (a) of Code
77 Section 8-3-202, relating to unlawful practices in selling or renting dwellings and exceptions,
78 as follows:
79 "(1) To refuse to sell or rent after the making of a bona fide offer, or to refuse to
80 negotiate for the sale or rental of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling to
81 any person because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability,
82 familial status, or national origin;
83 (2) To discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of sale or
84 rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection therewith,
85 because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status, or
86 national origin;
87 (3) To make, print, or publish or cause to be made, printed, or published any notice,
88 statement, or advertisement, with respect to the sale or rental of a dwelling, that indicates
89 any preference, limitation, or discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual
H. B. 670
- 4 -

25 LC 48 1550
90 orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin, or an intention to make any
91 such preference, limitation, or discrimination;
92 (4) To represent to any person because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation,
93 age, disability, familial status, or national origin that any dwelling is not available for
94 inspection, sale, or rental when such dwelling is in fact so available;
95 (5) For profit, to induce or attempt to induce any person to sell or rent any dwelling by
96 representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person
97 or persons of a particular race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, familial status,
98 or national origin or with a disability;"
99 SECTION 2-3.
100 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 8-3-203, relating to unlawful denial
101 of or discrimination in membership or participation in service or organization relating to
102 selling or renting dwellings, as follows:
103 "8-3-203.
104 It shall be unlawful to deny any person access to or membership or participation in any
105 multiple-listing service, real estate brokers' organization, or other service, organization, or
106 facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings or to discriminate against
107 such person in the terms or conditions of such access, membership, or participation on
108 account of race, color, religion, sex, disability, familial status, or national origin race, color,
109 religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national
110 origin."
111 SECTION 2-4.
112 Said title is further amended by revising subsections (b) and (c) of Code Section 8-3-204,
113 relating to discrimination in residential real estate related transactions and appraisals, as
114 follows:
H. B. 670
- 5 -

25 LC 48 1550
115 "(b) It shall be unlawful for any person or other entity whose business includes engaging
116 in residential real estate related transactions to discriminate against any person in making
117 available such a transaction or in the terms or conditions of such a transaction because of
118 race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, handicap, familial status, or
119 national origin.
120 (c) Nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit a person engaged in the business
121 of furnishing appraisals of real property from taking into consideration factors other than
122 race, color, religion, national origin, sex, handicap, or familial status race, color, religion,
123 national origin, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin."
124 SECTION 2-5.
125 Said title is further amended by revising subsection (a) of Code Section 8-3-205, relating to
126 permissible limitations in sale, rental, or occupancy of dwellings by religious organizations
127 or private clubs and housing for older persons, as follows:
128 "(a) Nothing in this article shall prohibit a religious organization, association, or society,
129 or any nonprofit institution or organization operated, supervised, or controlled by or in
130 conjunction with a religious organization, association, or society, from limiting the sale,
131 rental, or occupancy of dwellings which it owns or operates for other than a commercial
132 purpose noncommercial purposes to persons of the same religion or from giving preference
133 to such persons unless membership in such religion is restricted on account of race, color,
134 sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, handicap, familial status, or national origin.
135 Nothing in this article shall prohibit a private club not in fact open to the public, which as
136 an incident to its primary purpose or purposes provides lodgings which it owns or operates
137 for other than a commercial purpose noncommercial purposes, from limiting the rental or
138 occupancy of such lodgings to its members or from giving preference to its members."
H. B. 670
- 6 -

25 LC 48 1550
139 PART III
140 SECTION 3-1.
141 Title 10 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to commerce and trade, is
142 amended by adding a new chapter to read as follows:
143 "CHAPTER 16
144 10-16-1.
145 (a) It is the policy of the State of Georgia to provide, within constitutional limitations, for
146 equal enjoyment of public accommodations throughout this state.
147 (b) The general purpose of this chapter is to provide for execution in this state of the
148 policies embodied in 42 U.S.C. Section 2000a, et seq., as of January 1, 2025, and 42 U.S.C.
149 Section 1981, as of January 1, 2025.
150 (c) This chapter shall be broadly construed to further the general purposes stated in this
151 Code section and the special purposes of the particular provision involved.
152 10-16-2.
153 As used in this chapter, the term 'place of public accommodation' shall have the same
154 meaning as the term 'public accommodation' as set forth in the Americans with Disabilities
155 Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. Section 12181, et seq., as of January 1, 2025.
156 10-16-3.
157 (a) All persons shall be entitled to the full and equal enjoyment of the goods, services,
158 facilities, privileges, advantages, and accommodations of any place of public
159 accommodation without discrimination or segregation on the basis of race, color, religion,
160 sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin.
H. B. 670
- 7 -

25 LC 48 1550
161 (b) It shall be unlawful for any person to:
162 (1) Withhold, deny, or attempt to withhold or deny, or deprive or attempt to deprive any
163 person of any right or privilege secured by subsection (a) of this Code section;
164 (2) Intimidate, threaten, or coerce, or attempt to intimidate, threaten, or coerce any
165 person with the purpose of interfering with any right or privilege secured by
166 subsection (a) of this Code section; or
167 (3) Punish or attempt to punish any person for exercising or attempting to exercise any
168 right or privilege secured by subsection (a) of this Code section.
169 10-16-4.
170 When any person has engaged or there are reasonable grounds to believe that any person
171 is about to engage in any act or practice prohibited by subsection (b) of Code
172 Section 10-16-3, a civil action for preventive relief, including an application for a
173 permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order, may be instituted by
174 the person aggrieved, and the court may grant such relief as it deems appropriate. In any
175 action commenced pursuant to this chapter, the court, in its discretion, may allow the
176 prevailing party reasonable attorney's fees as part of the costs.
177 10-16-5.
178 This chapter shall be broadly construed to safeguard against the discrimination prohibited
179 by this chapter."
180 PART IV
181 SECTION 4-1.
182 Title 34 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to labor and industrial relations,
183 is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
H. B. 670
- 8 -

25 LC 48 1550
184 "34-1-11.
185 (a)(1) It is the policy of the State of Georgia to provide, within constitutional limitations,
186 for equal employment opportunities throughout this state.
187 (2) The general purpose of this Code section is to provide for execution in this state of
188 policies embodied in 42 U.S.C. Section 2000e, et seq., as of January 1, 2025.
189 (b) As used in this Code section, the term 'employer' means a person engaged in an
190 industry affecting commerce, as defined in 42 U.S.C. Section 2000e, et. seq., as of
191 January 1, 2025, that has 15 or more employees for each working day in each of 20 or more
192 calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year, and any agent of such person.
193 Such term does not include:
194 (1) The United States, a corporation wholly owned by the government of the United
195 States, or an American Indian tribe;
196 (2) A bona fide private membership club, other than a labor organization, as defined
197 in 42 U.S.C. Section 2000e, et. seq., as of January 1, 2025, which is exempt from taxation
198 under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as of January 1, 2025; or
199 (3) A public employer as defined in Code Section 45-19-22.
200 (c) It shall be unlawful for an employer to:
201 (1) Fail or refuse to hire or to discharge any individual, or otherwise to discriminate
202 against any individual with respect to such individual's compensation, terms, conditions,
203 or privileges of employment, because of such individual's race, color, religion, sex, sexual
204 orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin; or
205 (2) Limit, segregate, or classify its employees or applicants for employment in any way
206 which would deprive or tend to deprive any individual of employment opportunities or
207 otherwise adversely affect such individual's status as an employee, because of such
208 individual's race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status,
209 or national origin.
H. B. 670
- 9 -

25 LC 48 1550
210 (d) An employee in this state shall have a private right of action for a claim against such
211 employee's employer on the basis of discrimination for a violation of subsection (c) of this
212 Code section.
213 (e)(1) If the court finds that a respondent has intentionally engaged in or is intentionally
214 engaging in an unlawful employment practice as charged in the complaint, the court may
215 enjoin the respondent from engaging in such unlawful employment practice, and order
216 such affirmative action as may be appropriate, which may include, but shall not be
217 limited to, reinstatement or hiring of employees, with or without back pay, or any other
218 equitable relief as the court deems appropriate. Back pay liability shall not accrue from
219 a date more than two years prior to the filing of a claim. Interim earnings or amounts
220 earnable with reasonable diligence by the person or persons discriminated against shall
221 operate to reduce the back pay otherwise allowable.
222 (2) No order of the court shall require the hiring, reinstatement, or promotion of an
223 individual as an employee, or the payment to such individual of any back pay, if such
224 individual was refused admission, employment, or advancement or was suspended,
225 expelled, or discharged for any reason other than such individual's race, color, religion,
226 sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin in violation of
227 this Code section.
228 (f) This Code section shall be broadly construed to safeguard against the discrimination
229 prohibited in this Code section."
230 SECTION 4-2.
231 Title 35 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to law enforcement officers and
232 agencies, is amended by adding a new chapter to read as follows:
H. B. 670
- 10 -

25 LC 48 1550
233 "CHAPTER 11
234 35-11-1.
235 This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the 'End Racial Profiling Act.'
236 35-11-2.
237 As used in this chapter, the term:
238 (1) 'Hit rate' means the percentage of stops and searches in which a law enforcement
239 officer finds drugs, a firearm, or other contraband that leads to an arrest. Such percentage
240 shall be calculated by dividing the total number of searches by the number of searches
241 that lead to arrests.
242 (2) 'Law enforcement agency' means any agency, organ, or department of this state, or
243 a subdivision or municipality thereof, whose primary functions include the enforcement
244 of criminal or traffic laws; the preservation of public order; the protection of life and
245 property; or the prevention, detection, or investigation of crime, including, but not limited
246 to, any department or unit organized by a college or university for purposes of Chapter 8
247 of Title 20.
248 (3) 'Law enforcement officer' means any agent or officer of this state, a political
249 subdivision or municipality of this state, an authority of this state, or a college or
250 university who, as a full-time or part-time employee, is vested either expressly by law or
251 by virtue of public employment or service with authority to enforce the criminal or traffic
252 laws through the power of arrest and whose duties include the preservation of public
253 order, the protection of life and property, or the prevention, detection, or investigation of
254 crime.
255 (4) 'Racial profiling' means the practice of a law enforcement agency or law enforcement
256 officer relying, to any degree, on actual or perceived race, color, religion, sex, sexual
257 orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin in selecting which individual
H. B. 670
- 11 -

25 LC 48 1550
258 to subject to routine or spontaneous investigatory activities or in deciding upon the scope
259 and substance of law enforcement activity following the initial investigatory procedure.
260 (5) 'Routine or spontaneous investigatory activities' means the following activities by a
261 law enforcement officer:
262 (A) Interviews;
263 (B) Traffic stops;
264 (C) Pedestrian stops;
265 (D) Frisks and other types of body searches;
266 (E) Consensual or nonconsensual searches of the persons, property, vehicles, or
267 possessions of individuals, including, but not limited to, motorists and pedestrians,
268 using any form of public or private transportation; or
269 (F) Data collection and analysis, assessments, and predicated investigations.
270 35-11-3.
271 No law enforcement officer or law enforcement agency shall engage in racial profiling.
272 35-11-4.
273 (a) All law enforcement agencies shall:
274 (1) Maintain adequate policies and procedures designed to eliminate racial profiling; and
275 (2) Cease any existing practices that permit racial profiling.
276 (b) The policies and procedures provided for under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this
277 Code section shall include:
278 (1) A prohibition on racial profiling;
279 (2) Training on racial profiling issues;
280 (3) The collection of data in accordance with regulations issued by the Attorney General;
281 and
H. B. 670
- 12 -

25 LC 48 1550
282 (4) Procedures for receiving, investigating, and responding meaningfully to complaints
283 alleging racial profiling by law enforcement officers.
284 (c) Beginning on July 1, 2025, and on July 1 of each year thereafter, the Attorney General
285 shall issue a public report based upon the data collected by the Attorney General pursuant
286 to this Code section for the prior calendar year. Such report shall detail for each law
287 enforcement agency the number of routine or spontaneous investigatory activities and the
288 hit rates. Such report shall disaggregate such data by race, ethnicity, and national origin.
289 35-11-5.
290 (a) The Attorney General or any individual injured by racial profiling may enforce this
291 chapter in a civil action for declaratory or injunctive relief filed in the superior court.
292 (b) In any action brought under this Code section, relief may be obtained against any:
293 (1) Agency, organ, or department of this state, or a subdivision or municipality thereof,
294 or a college or university that employed any law enforcement officer who engaged in
295 racial profiling;
296 (2) Law enforcement officer who engaged in racial profiling; or
297 (3) Any individual with supervisory authority over such law enforcement officer.
298 (c) Proof that the routine or spontaneous investigatory activities of law enforcement
299 officers in a jurisdiction have had a disparate impact on individuals because of such
300 individual's actual or perceived race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability,
301 familial status, or national origin shall constitute prima-facie evidence of a violation of this
302 chapter.
303 (d) In any action or proceeding to enforce this chapter against any agency, organ, or
304 department of this state, or a subdivision or municipality thereof, or a college or university,
305 the court may allow a prevailing plaintiff, other than the Attorney General, reasonable
306 attorney's fees as part of the costs and may include expert's fees as part of the attorney's
307 fees."
H. B. 670
- 13 -

25 LC 48 1550
308 SECTION 4-3.
309 Title 45 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to public officers and employees,
310 is amended by revising Code Section 45-19-21, relating to the purposes and construction of
311 the "Fair Employment Practices Act of 1978," as follows:
312 "45-19-21.
313 (a) The general purposes of this article are:
314 (1) To provide for execution within public employment in the this state of the policies
315 embodied in Title VII of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964 (78 Stat. 241), as amended
316 by the Equal Employment Opportunity Act of 1972 (86 Stat. 103), as from time to time
317 amended, the federal Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 (81 Stat. 602), as
318 from time to time amended, and the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (87 Stat. 355), as
319 from time to time amended;
320 (2) To safeguard all individuals in public employment from discrimination in
321 employment; and
322 (3) To promote the elimination of discrimination against all individuals in public
323 employment because of such individuals' race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
324 disability, or age race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial
325 status, or national origin, thereby to promote the protection of their interest in personal
326 dignity and freedom from humiliation; to make available to the this state their full
327 productive capacities; to secure the this state against domestic strife and unrest which
328 would menace its democratic institutions; to preserve the public safety, health, and
329 general welfare; and to further the interests, rights, and privileges of individuals within
330 the this state.
331 (b) This article shall be broadly construed to further the general purposes stated in this
332 Code section and the special purposes of the particular provision involved.
333 (c) Nothing in this article shall be construed as indicating an intent to exclude local or
334 federal laws on the same subject matter, which laws are not inconsistent with this article.
H. B. 670
- 14 -

25 LC 48 1550
335 (d) Nothing contained in this article shall be deemed to repeal any other nonconflicting law
336 of this state relating to discrimination because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
337 disability, or age race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status,
338 or national origin."
339 SECTION 4-4.
340 Said title is further amended by revising paragraph (4) of Code Section 45-19-22, relating
341 to definitions relative to the "Fair Employment Practices Act of 1978," as follows:
342 "(4) 'Discrimination' means any direct or indirect act or practice of exclusion, distinction,
343 restriction, segregation, limitation, refusal, denial, or any other act or practice of
344 differentiation or preference in the treatment of a person or persons because of race,
345 color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, handicap, or age race, color, religion, sex,
346 sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin, or the aiding,
347 abetting, inciting, coercing, or compelling of such an act or practice. Such term shall not
348 include any direct or indirect act or practice of exclusion, distinction, restriction,
349 segregation, limitation, refusal, denial, or any other act or practice of differentiation or
350 preference in the treatment of a person or persons because of religion if an employer
351 demonstrates that the employer is unable to accommodate reasonably an employee's or
352 prospective employee's religious observance or practice without undue hardship on the
353 conduct of the employer's operation."
354 SECTION 4-5.
355 Said title is further amended by revising paragraphs (8) and (14) of Code Section 45-19-27,
356 relating to additional powers and duties of the administrator of the Commission on Equal
357 Opportunity, as follows:
358 "(8) To receive, initiate, investigate, seek to conciliate, and make determinations
359 regarding complaints alleging violations of this article and to approve or disapprove plans
H. B. 670
- 15 -

25 LC 48 1550
360 required by the Governor to eliminate or reduce imbalance in employment with respect
361 to race, color, disability, religion, sex, national origin, or age race, color, religion, sex,
362 sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin;"
363 "(14) To adopt, promulgate, amend, and rescind, subject to approval of the board and the
364 Governor and after giving proper notice and hearing to all public employers pursuant to
365 Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,' such rules and
366 regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article, including
367 regulations requiring the posting or inclusion in advertising material of notices prepared
368 or approved by the administrator and regulations regarding the filing, approval, or
369 disapproval of plans to eliminate or reduce imbalance in employment with respect to race,
370 color, disability, religion, sex, national origin, or age race, color, religion, sex, sexual
371 orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin;"
372 SECTION 4-6.
373 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 45-19-29, relating to unlawful
374 practices generally relative to fair employment practices, as follows:
375 "45-19-29.
376 It is an unlawful practice for an employer:
377 (1) To fail or refuse to hire, to discharge, or otherwise to discriminate against any
378 individual with respect to the individual's compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges
379 of employment because of such individual's race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
380 disability, or age race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial
381 status, or national origin;
382 (2) To limit, segregate, or classify his such employer's employees in any way which
383 would deprive or tend to deprive an individual of employment opportunities or otherwise
384 adversely affect an individual's status as an employee because of such individual's race,
H. B. 670
- 16 -

25 LC 48 1550
385 color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status, or
386 national origin disability, or age; or
387 (3) To hire, promote, advance, segregate, or affirmatively hire an individual solely
388 because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability,
389 familial status, or national origin disability, or age, but this paragraph shall not prohibit
390 an employer from voluntarily adopting and carrying out a plan to fill vacancies or hire
391 new employees in a manner to eliminate or reduce imbalance in employment with respect
392 to race, color, disability, religion, sex, national origin, or age race, color, religion, sex,
393 sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin if the plan has first
394 been filed with the administrator for review and comment for a period of not less than 30
395 days."
396 SECTION 4-7.
397 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 45-19-30, relating to unlawful
398 practices in training or apprenticeship programs, as follows:
399 "45-19-30.
400 It is an unlawful practice for an employer controlling apprenticeship or other training or
401 retraining, including on-the-job training programs, to discriminate against an individual
402 because of such individual's race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation,
403 age, disability, familial status, or national origin disability, or age in admission to or
404 employment in any program established to provide apprenticeship or other training or to
405 discriminate by allowing admission or promotion to an apprenticeship or training program
406 solely because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age race, color,
407 religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin."
H. B. 670
- 17 -

25 LC 48 1550
408 SECTION 4-8.
409 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 45-19-31, relating to unlawful
410 practices in advertisement of employment, as follows:
411 "45-19-31.
412 It is an unlawful practice for an employer to print or publish or cause to be printed or
413 published a notice or advertisement relating to employment by such an employer indicating
414 any preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination based on race, color, religion,
415 national origin, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin
416 disability, or age, except that such a notice or advertisement may indicate a preference,
417 limitation, or specification based on race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual
418 orientation, age, disability, or national origin disability, or age when religion, national
419 origin, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, or national origin disability, or age is a bona
420 fide occupational qualification for employment."
421 SECTION 4-9.
422 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 45-19-33, relating to different
423 standards of compensation or different terms and conditions of employment where not based
424 on race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or age, as follows:
425 "45-19-33.
426 It is not an unlawful practice for an employer to apply different standards of compensation
427 or different terms, conditions, or privileges of employment pursuant to a bona fide seniority
428 or merit system, or a system which measures earnings by quantity or quality of production,
429 or to employees who work in different locations, provided that such differences are not the
430 result of an intention to discriminate because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
431 disability, or age race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status,
432 or national origin; nor is it an unlawful practice for an employer to give and to act upon the
433 results of any professionally developed ability test, provided that such test, its
H. B. 670
- 18 -

25 LC 48 1550
434 administration, or action upon the results thereof is not designed, intended, or used to
435 discriminate because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age race,
436 color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin."
437 SECTION 4-10.
438 Said title is further amended by revising subsections (b) and (c) of Code Section 45-19-35,
439 relating to use of quotas because of imbalances in employee ratios prohibited, grants of
440 preferential treatment to certain individuals or groups not required by the "Fair Employment
441 Practices Act of 1978," adoption of plans required by Governor to reduce imbalance, and
442 effect of the "Fair Employment Practices Act of 1978" upon certain employment practices,
443 as follows:
444 "(b) Nothing contained in this article requires an employer to grant preferential treatment
445 to an individual or to a group because of the race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
446 sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin, disability, or age of the
447 individual or group on account of an imbalance which may exist with respect to the total
448 number or percentage of persons of any race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual
449 orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin disability, or age in the in this
450 state or a community, section, or other area or in the available work force workforce in the
451 this state or a community, section, or other area.
452 (c) It is specifically provided that neither subsection (a) nor (b) of this Code section nor
453 any other provision of this article shall prohibit an employer from adopting or carrying out
454 a plan to fill vacancies or hire new employees in a manner to eliminate or reduce imbalance
455 in employment with respect to race, color, disability, religion, sex, national origin, sexual
456 orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin or age if such plan is required
457 by the Governor and filed with and approved by the administrator prior to its final adoption
458 and implementation."
H. B. 670
- 19 -

25 LC 48 1550
459 SECTION 4-11.
460 Said title is further amended by revising paragraph (7) of subsection (c) of Code
461 Section 45-19-38, relating to findings, conclusions, and order of hearing officer generally and
462 order to cease and desist from unlawful practice and to take remedial action, as follows:
463 "(7) Recommending to the Governor that the respondent be required to adopt and file
464 with the administrator, within a specified time limitation, for the administrator's approval
465 a plan to fill vacancies or hire new employees in a manner to eliminate or reduce
466 imbalance in employment with respect to race, color, disability, religion, sex, national
467 origin, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status, or national origin or age."
468 SECTION 4-12.
469 Said title is further amended by revising paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code
470 Section 45-20-1, relating to purposes and principles relative to personnel administration of
471 public officers and employees, as follows:
472 "(1) Assuring fair treatment of applicants and employees in all aspects of personnel
473 administration without regard to race, color, national origin, sex, age, disability, religious
474 creed, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial status, or
475 national origin, or political affiliations. This 'fair treatment' principle includes compliance
476 with all state and federal equal employment opportunity and nondiscrimination laws;"
477 SECTION 4-13.
478 Said title is further amended by revising paragraph (2) of Code Section 45-20-4, relating to
479 duties and responsibilities of commissioner relative to personnel administration, as follows:
480 "(2) To submit to the Governor the rules and regulations adopted by the board. Such
481 rules and regulations when approved by the Governor shall have the force and effect of
482 law and shall be binding upon the state departments covered by this article and shall
483 include provisions for the establishment and maintenance of classification and
H. B. 670
- 20 -

25 LC 48 1550
484 compensation plans, the conduct of examinations, appointments, promotions, transfers,
485 demotions, appeals of classified employees, reports of performance, payroll certification,
486 and other phases of personnel administration. Such rules and regulations shall define and
487 prohibit improper political activity by any departmental employee of the State Personnel
488 Board or any employee covered under the terms of this article and shall provide that there
489 shall be no discrimination for or against any person or employee in any manner, to
490 include, but not be limited to, hiring, discharge, compensation, benefits, terms or
491 conditions of employment, promotion, job classification, transfer, privileges, or demotion
492 because of political affiliation, religious affiliation, race, color, creed, national origin, sex,
493 sexual orientation, disability, familial status, or age between 40 and 70 years, or physical
494 disability. Such rules and regulations shall conform to the minimum standards for merit
495 systems of personnel administration as specified by those federal departments from which
496 federal funds are obtained for use by the several state departments covered by this article.
497 Compensation plans and modifications thereto promulgated under the rules and
498 regulations of the commissioner shall become effective as adopted upon approval of by
499 the director of the Office of Planning and Budget;"
500 SECTION 4-14.
501 Said title is further amended by revising subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of Code
502 Section 45-20-51, relating to definitions relative to voluntary deductions from wages or
503 salaries of state employees for benefit of charitable organizations, as follows:
504 "(C) Observes a policy and practice of nondiscrimination on the basis of race, color,
505 religion, sex, national origin, or disability, sexual orientation, age, disability, familial
506 status, or national origin, and such policy is applicable to persons served by the agency,
507 to agency staff employment, and to membership on the agency's governing board; and"
H. B. 670
- 21 -

25 LC 48 1550
508 SECTION 4-15.
509 Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state government, is amended
510 in Article 2 of Chapter 21, relating to state tort reforms, by adding a new Code section to read
511 as follows:
512 "50-21-38.
513 The defense of sovereign immunity is waived as to any claim, counterclaim, cross-claim,
514 or third-party claim brought in the courts of this state by an aggrieved person seeking a
515 declaratory judgment, injunctive relief, or reasonable attorney's fees against the state or any
516 political subdivision thereof under Chapter 11 of Title 35; provided, however, that
517 sovereign immunity shall not be waived as to any claim for monetary damages that are
518 included in or related to such claim, counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim. This
519 Code section shall not be construed to alter or amend any other waiver of sovereign
520 immunity provided by law."
521 PART V
522 SECTION 5-1.
523 This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
524 SECTION 5-2.
525 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 670
- 22 -